Arkansas, session 2025, SB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-111, concerning the determination of
the sufficiency of a petition for initiatives, referenda, and constitutional
amendments, is amended to add additional subsections to read as follows:
(j)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (j)(4) of this section, a
canvasser shall file a true affidavit with the Secretary of State certifying
that the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas Constitution and all
Arkansas law regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery, and fraudulent practices
in the procurement of petition signatures during the current election cycle.
(2) The Secretary of State shall not count the signatures
submitted by the canvasser until a true affidavit is submitted under
subdivision (j)(1) of this section.
(3) A true affidavit submitted under subdivision (j)(1) of this
*SSS127*
02-19-2025 10:45:53 SSS127

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 SB211
section shall have no bearing to establish the genuineness or falsity of the
signatures obtained by the canvasser.
(4)(A) The inability of a canvasser to submit an affidavit due
to death or medical disability shall not disqualify the signatures gathered
by the canvasser.
(B) Subdivision (j)(4)(A) of this section does not excuse
a canvasser from filing the affidavit required under § 7-9-109.
(k) A canvasser who has filed a true affidavit under subsection (j) of
this section shall not collect additional signatures unless the Secretary of
State determines that the sponsor of the initiative petition or referendum
petition is eligible for an amendment to the initiative petition or
referendum petition under Arkansas Constitution, Art. 5, § 1.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-126(c), concerning signatures that will
not be counted for any reason that appear on the petition, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(8) Signatures submitted by a canvasser who has not filed a true
affidavit with the Secretary of State as required under § 7-9-111 certifying
that the canvasser has complied with the Arkansas Constitution and all
Arkansas laws regarding canvassing, perjury, forgery, and fraudulent
practices in the procurement of petition signatures during the current
election cycle.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act
are declared to be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act
shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision.

SECTION 4. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process for citizens to
propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution is
critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that it is of the
utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process be
strengthened through this act so that petitioners and voters maintain a high
degree of confidence in the soundness of their right to legislate as citizens
of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because any delay in
02-19-2025 10:45:53 SSS127

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 SB211
the implementation of this act would disrupt the initiative process for the
2026 general election, which would have a detrimental effect on the public
peace, health, and safety of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/K. Hammer























02-19-2025 10:45:53 SSS127